Louisiana, session 2026, HB1166.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:3196(introductory paragraph), (2), (4), and (6), 3197(A),
(B)(introductory paragraph), (3), (8), (9), and (12), 3198 (A)(1) and (2)(a), 3198.1(A) and
(B), and 3199(A) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 9:3196(7) is hereby enacted
to read as follows:
CHAPTER 8. RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY DISCLOSURE REQUIREMENTS
§3196. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings
hereinafter ascribed to them:
* * *
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1166 ENROLLED
(2) "Property disclosure document" means a document in a form prescribed
by the Louisiana Real Estate Commission, or a form that contains at least the
minimum language prescribed by the commission, which is presented by the seller
to the purchaser in the manner set forth in R.S. 9:3198(B) and which discloses, at a
minimum, known defects in the either residential real property or vacant residential
property.
* * *
(4) "Real estate contract" means any written agreement, entered into prior
to the perfection of the contract of sale or contract to lease or otherwise with an
option to purchase, which relates to the sale, offer for sale, purchase, offer to
purchase, lease with option to purchase, offer to lease with option to purchase, any
other option to purchase, or any other offer which includes an option to purchase any
residential real property, vacant residential property, or improvements thereon.
* * *
(6) "Seller" means an owner of residential real property or vacant residential
property, whether an individual, partnership, corporation, or trust, who sells or
attempts to sell residential real property or vacant residential property in a manner
described in R.S. 9:3197(A).
(7)(a) "Vacant residential property" means any land that is either legally
authorized to be used solely for residential purposes or is otherwise classified or
intended for residential use and may include uninhabitable improvements or no
improvements including but not limited to slabs, utility connections, driveways,
walkways, fencing, wells, septic systems, sheds, and agricultural or storage
structures.
(b) "Vacant residential property" does not include the following:
(i) Residential real property as defined in this Section.
(ii) Any land that is legally authorized to be used for agricultural,
commercial, industrial, or other nonresidential purposes.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1166 ENROLLED
§3197. Applicability; exemptions
A. The provisions of this Chapter shall apply to the transfer of any interest
in residential real property or vacant residential property, whether by sale, exchange,
bond for deed, lease with option to purchase, or any other option to purchase,
including transactions in which the assistance of a real estate licensee is utilized and
those in which such assistance is not utilized.
B. The provisions of this Chapter shall do not apply to any of the following:
* * *
(3) Transfers by a mortgagee who has acquired the residential real property
or vacant residential property at a sale conducted pursuant to a power of sale under
a mortgage or a sale pursuant to decree of foreclosure, or who has acquired the
vacant or residential property by a deed in lieu of foreclosure.
* * *
(8) Transfers of residential real property or vacant residential property that
will be converted by the purchaser into a use other than residential use.
(9) Transfers of residential real property or vacant residential property to a
spouse or relative in the line of consanguinity.
* * *
(12) Transfers from an entity that has acquired title or assignment of a real
estate contract to a piece of residential real property or vacant residential property
to assist the prior owner in relocating, as long as the entity makes available to the
purchaser a copy of the property disclosure statement, any inspection reports if any
furnished to the entity by the prior owner, or both.
* * *
§3198. Duties of the seller; delivery of property disclosure document; termination
of real estate contract; information contained in document and inaccuracies;
required disclosure of information relative to homeowners' associations and
restrictive covenants; liability of seller
A.(1) The seller of residential real property or vacant residential property
shall complete a property disclosure document in a form prescribed by the Louisiana
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1166 ENROLLED
Real Estate Commission or a form that contains at least the minimum language
prescribed by the commission. The promulgation of this form shall be conducted in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act no later than April 1, 2004.
(2)(a) Included with the property disclosure documents required by this
Section shall be statements of notification to the purchaser as to whether he is
obligated to be a member of a homeowners' association as a homeowner in the
community in which he is purchasing property and whether the residential property
or vacant residential property he is purchasing is subject to a common regime of
restrictive covenants or building restrictions, or both.
* * *
§3198.1. Duties of governmental entities; contaminated property
A. Whenever a state or local law enforcement agency becomes aware that
residential real property or vacant residential property has been contaminated by its
use as a clandestine methamphetamine drug lab, the agency shall report the
contamination to the Department of Environmental Quality, hereinafter referred to
in this Section as the "department", and to the local sheriff's office.
B. The department shall maintain a listing of residential real property or
vacant residential property that has been reported as contaminated, and the list shall
be made available to the public through a website.
* * *
§3199. Duty of real estate licensees; liability
A. A real estate licensee representing a seller of residential real property or
vacant residential property shall inform the seller of the duties and rights under
established in this Chapter. A real estate licensee representing a buyer of residential
real property or vacant residential property shall inform the buyer of the duties and
rights under established in this Chapter.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 37:1432(A) and 1455(A)(introductory paragraph) and (33) are
hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1166 ENROLLED
§1432. Louisiana Real Estate Commission; qualifications; terms of office
A. The Louisiana Real Estate Commission is hereby created within the office
of the governor. The commission shall consist of eleven members appointed by the
governor. One member shall be appointed from each of the seven supreme court
districts. Two members shall be appointed at large. Two members shall be
appointed from the following districts: one appointee from either the Fourth
Congressional District or the Fifth Congressional District and one appointee from
either the First, Second, Third, or Sixth Congressional District. One member shall
be appointed from each congressional district, and the remaining members shall be
appointed at large. Each appointment by the governor shall be submitted to the
Senate for confirmation.
* * *
§1455. Causes for censure, suspension, or revocation of license, registration, or
certification
A. The commission may censure a licensee, registrant, or certificate holder
or conditionally or unconditionally suspend or revoke any license, registration, or
certificate issued under pursuant to this Chapter, levy fines, or impose civil penalties
not to exceed five thousand dollars, or impose continuing education requirements on
licensees, registrants, or certificate holders if, in the opinion of the commission, a
licensee, registrant, or certificate holder is performing or attempting to perform or
has performed or has attempted to perform any of the following acts:
* * *
(33) Failure by a licensee to provide who represents a buyer or seller with
a written property disclosure form for sales and certain leases involving residential
real property pursuant to of residential real property or vacant residential property
to inform such buyer or seller of the duties and rights regarding the written property
disclosure form requirements pursuant to R.S. 9:3196 et seq.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 37:1432(A) as amended and reenacted by Section 2 of this Act shall
not be construed to change the existing term of appointment for any member of the
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1166 ENROLLED
Louisiana Real Estate Commission who is serving as a commissioner on the effective date
of this Act.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective January 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.